Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.220

ESD board—Delegation of powers and duties to superintendent.

Each educational service district board, by written order filed in the headquarters office, may delegate to the educational service district superintendent any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon the board by law or rule or regulation of the state board of education and/or the superintendent of public instruction. Such delegated powers and duties shall not be in conflict with rules or regulations of the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education and may be exercised by the educational service district superintendent in the name of the board.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 20; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 15. Formerly RCW 28A.21.095.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.